Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2211.02
Greatest social need, defined.

Greatest social need shall mean the need caused by noneconomic factors, including physical and mental disabilities, language barriers, and cultural, social, or geographic isolation including that caused by racial or ethnic status, which restricts an individual's ability to perform normal daily tasks, which threatens such individual's capacity to live independently, or which interferes with the exercise of rights and privileges.

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 12.